Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-26] Forfeitures. The forfeiture
of any property unlawfully possessed, pursuant to section 127A-12(b), may be
adjudged upon conviction of the offender found to be unlawfully in possession
of the same, where no person other than the offender is entitled to notice and
hearing with respect to the forfeiture, or the forfeiture may be enforced by an
appropriate civil proceeding brought in the name of the State. The district
courts and circuit courts shall have concurrent jurisdiction of the civil proceedings.
Any property forfeited as provided in this section may be ordered destroyed, or
may be ordered delivered for public use to such agency as shall be designated
by the governor or the governor's representative, or may be ordered sold, in
whole or in part, for the account of the State. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next